Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska41-214
Proprietor's liability; notice of loss required; when; display copy of law.

There shall be no liability on the part of the proprietor of any hotel, apartment house, rooming house, restaurant, or motel, for loss of, or damage to, any property of guests of such place of business unless within seven days from the time of discovery of any loss or damage, such loss or damage is reported in writing to such proprietor. A copy of this section in not smaller than ten-point type shall be conspicuously posted in the public areas and in each room of each hotel, restaurant, apartment house, motel, or rooming house desiring to obtain the benefit of this section.

Laws 1982, LB 547, § 14.